Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 4

Tennessee Local Development Authority Capital Projects Loan Act of 1990

4-31-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Local Development Authority Capital Projects Loan Act of 1990.”

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13; 1990, ch. 885, § 6.

4-31-402. Legislative intent.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Financing costs incurred by local governments in connection with capital projects are a significant factor in the ability of the local governments to meet the needs of their communities; and

To the extent that financing of capital projects can be accomplished less expensively through the pooling together of needs and the use of less costly borrowing techniques, local governments would be better able to provide capital projects, and other essential services for the benefit of their citizens and taxpayers.

It is accordingly in furtherance of the interests and welfare of all Tennesseans that the Tennessee local development authority be empowered to issue its revenue bonds and to make the proceeds available for loans to local government units for capital projects, at a cost that is lower than would otherwise be readily obtainable.

It is intended that the Tennessee local development authority be vested with all powers necessary to accomplish these purposes.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13; 1990, ch. 885, § 7.

4-31-403. “Construction” defined.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “construction” means the building, reconstruction, creation, replacement, extension, repairing, betterment, improvement, alteration, equipment, extension or acquisition of capital projects, including, but not limited to, the acquisition of land and of rights in land, the engineering, architectural designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures and other action necessary in the construction of such capital projects, and the inspection and supervision of such capital projects.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13; 1990, ch. 885, § 8.

4-31-404. Loans for capital projects authorized for local government units receiving state-shared taxes — Schedule of payments.

In addition to the powers otherwise granted by law, the authority has the power and is authorized to make loans to any local government unit for the construction of capital projects pursuant to a loan program agreement between the local government and the authority. Such loans shall be made from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued by the authority for the purpose of making such loans.

Only local government units receiving state-shared taxes shall be eligible to participate in the loan program; provided, that a local government unit receiving state-shared taxes may jointly enter into a loan agreement with the authority and loan the proceeds of such loan to a local government unit not receiving state-shared taxes.

The authority shall establish a repayment schedule to be made by a local government unit under a loan agreement.

Such repayments shall be in such amounts as will be at least sufficient, together with other funds available therefor, to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds and notes issued by the authority for the purpose of providing loans to local government units for the construction of capital projects, and as may be necessary for the authority to maintain a reserve for debt service.

At the time of approval of a loan agreement, the annual repayment schedule applicable to all approved loans to a local government unit under provisions of this part, when combined with annual repayment schedules applicable to approved loans to local government units under title 68, chapter 221, parts 2 and 5, and [former] title 68, chapter 211, part 4 [repealed] or other state loan programs, shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the unobligated amount of annual state-shared taxes paid to the local government unit as shown by the latest completed audit for the state's fiscal year.

Nothing contained in this subsection (c) shall require a uniform test for all loans, it being the intent of the general assembly that the authority exercise discretion based on the facts and circumstances of each loan.

In exercising its discretion, the authority shall take into consideration the general financial condition of the local government unit receiving the loan.

For purposes of determining compliance with this subsection (c), the annual repayment schedule for each loan shall be, in cases prior to the funding of such loans or where such loans have been financed on an interim basis other than by bonds, an estimated annual repayment schedule showing debt service requirements under the loan agreements as if the bonds to be issued to fund such loans will bear interest at a rate per annum and mature in such manner as the authority shall establish at the time of the approval of each such loan and, in cases where bonds have been issued to fund such loan, the actual debt service requirements on such bonds.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13; 1990, ch. 885, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Title 68, chapter 211, part 4, referred to in this section and concerning resource and energy recovery, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 846, § 48, effective July 1, 1996.

4-31-405. Administration of loans.

The authority shall administer loans made under this part. In so doing, the authority may adopt rules and regulations necessary for the effective administration of this part, including the promulgation of prerequisites that must be fulfilled by the local government unit in order to be eligible for a loan, procedures to be followed in making loan applications to the authority, procedures to be followed in the disbursement of loan funds, and procedures for enforcing agreements entered into by local government units with the authority.

Any one (1) or more local government units entering into a loan agreement with the authority must state in the loan application, in addition to any requirements established by the authority, if the capital project is a correctional facility, that:

The plans for the construction of such correctional facility have been submitted to the Tennessee corrections institute for review and comment; and

The plans for construction of such correctional facility conform to standards established by the Tennessee corrections institute pursuant to § 41-4-140 and title 41, chapter 7, and the Life and Safety Code, as adopted by regulation of the department of commerce and insurance.

Prior to being placed into use, any project that is a correctional facility financed by the loan agreement must first be inspected, approved and certified by the Tennessee corrections institute pursuant to § 41-4-140 and title 41, chapter 7. Certification must be submitted to the authority within thirty (30) days of receipt by the local government unit.

If the capital project is a qualified energy conservation project, the local government unit shall first apply to the department of environment and conservation. Any loan agreement for such qualified energy conservation project must be recommended by the commissioner of that department.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13; 1990, ch. 885, § 10; 2012, ch. 957, § 3; 2016, ch. 743, § 14.

4-31-406. Loan agreements.

Subject to § 4-31-405 and subject to any existing contractual obligations of the local government, the authority may enter into loan agreements with any local government unit and any local government unit may enter into loan agreements with the authority for loans for capital projects described in this part.

Any loan agreement may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the authority and the local government subject to § 4-31-405 and shall additionally include, in substance, the following:

The amount of the loan, not to exceed the estimated reasonable cost of the project to be constructed, as determined by the authority;

An agreement by the authority to pay part of the amount of the loan to the local government unit during the progress of the construction, or to pay the amount of the loan following completion of the construction, as may be agreed upon by the parties; and

An agreement by the local government unit to:

Proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the project in accordance with the plans approved pursuant to this part;

Commence operation of the project on its completion, and not to discontinue operations or dispose of the project without the approval of the authority;

Operate and maintain the project in accordance with applicable provisions of this part and in compliance with rules and regulations of the authority;

Not contract with any corporation for profit, private person or firm for the operation of the same, notwithstanding any law authorizing such contracts, except upon approval by the authority of an application to the authority, which application shall include, but not be limited to, an opinion from a nationally recognized bond counsel that the contract will not affect the tax exempt status of the income of the authority's bonds or notes financing such facility under state or federal law;

To pledge any available sources of revenue to make payment according to a schedule established by the authority, including state-shared taxes and to make such payments; and

To establish and maintain adequate financial records for the project, and to cause to be made an annual audit of the financial records and transactions covering each fiscal year in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, and to furnish a copy of such audits to the comptroller of the treasury.

Failure of a local government unit to file the audit required by subdivision (b)(3)(F) with the comptroller of the treasury each year until the loan, together with interest, is totally repaid constitutes a Class A misdemeanor and anyone violating this provision, upon conviction, shall be liable for a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation, within discretion of the court, and each day of continued violation constitutes a separate offense.

The authority may promulgate any additional rules or regulations concerning the contract and change in operations of a capital project.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13; 1990, ch. 885, §§ 11-15.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, 40-35-111.

4-31-407. Further agreements and guarantees.

The authority has the right to enter into such further agreements with a local government unit and require such further guarantees or securities as it may see fit prior to, or simultaneously with, the issuance of bonds or to refuse to issue bonds until such agreements or securities, in any form that the authority may elect, are agreed to or are obtained.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13.

4-31-408. Preparation and approval of agreements — Approval of funding — Payments subject to audit.

The authority shall prepare, and the attorney general and reporter shall approve, a form of loan agreement to be used to evidence loans made to local government units pursuant to this part.

All loan agreements entered into pursuant to this part shall be subject to approval by the commissioner of finance and administration as to funding.

All payments made pursuant to loan agreements shall be made on vouchers approved by the authority, and such payments shall be subject to audit at any time.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13; 1990, ch. 885, § 16.

4-31-409. Allocation of funds — Criteria.

In allocating loan funds to local government units, the authority shall give consideration to, and apply, the following standards and criteria:

The need and desirability for capital projects; and

The ability of the local government unit to secure borrowed money from other sources and costs thereof.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13; 1990, ch. 885, § 17.

4-31-410. Tax levy to meet payments.

In the event the funds pledged shall be insufficient to meet the payments as established by the authority for its loan, the local government unit shall levy a tax on property sufficient to make such payments, which shall be in addition to all other taxes authorized or limited by law.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13; 1990, ch. 885, § 18.

4-31-411. Failure to make payments — Withholding of shared revenues authorized.

In the event any local government unit having entered into a loan agreement fails to remit funds in accordance with the annual repayment schedule established by the authority, the commissioner, within five (5) days of such failure, shall deliver by certified mail a written notice of such failure to the local government unit.

In the event the local government unit, as the case may be, shall fail to remit the amount set forth in the notice within sixty (60) days of the receipt of the notice, the commissioner shall, without further authorization, withhold such sum or part of such sum from any state-shared taxes that are otherwise apportioned to such local government unit for the benefit of the authority issuing bonds or notes for the purposes referred to in this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13.

4-31-412. Enforcing of agreement by court action.

The authority has the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to require the local government unit and the governing body and any proper officer, agent or employee of the local government unit to carry out any agreements and to perform its and their duties under this part or under any rule or regulation of the authority adopted pursuant thereto.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13.

4-31-413. Debt limit not applicable.

Local government units may enter into loan agreements under this part notwithstanding and without regard to any limit on indebtedness provided by law.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13.

4-31-414. Actions of governing body by resolution.

All action required or authorized to be taken under this part by the governing body of any local government unit may be by resolution, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting of the governing body at which such resolution is introduced, and shall take effect immediately upon its adoption.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13.

4-31-415. Provisions supplemental.

This part shall be in addition and supplemental to any other law providing for the financing of capital projects by local government units and shall not be deemed to amend or repeal any other law.

No proceedings by a local government unit shall be required for loan agreements hereunder, except as provided by this part, any law to the contrary notwithstanding.

No other requirements or restrictions applicable to borrowing by a local government unit contained in any other law shall be applicable to loans under this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 846, § 13; 1990, ch. 885, § 19.